Tennessee, session 114, HB1420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 519 of the Private Acts of 1911, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, that being the charter for the town of Rogersville, is amended by adding the following
new section immediately preceding the effective date section and by renumbering the
subsequent section accordingly:
Section 25. Be it further enacted, That the board of mayor and aldermen of the
town of Rogersville, Tennessee, may direct the county election commission to place
certain questions on the ballot to be submitted to the voters of the town of Rogersville,
Tennessee, on matters of general and vital concern in order to obtain the advice and
direction of the voters as to such matters. Such referenda will be advisory in nature and
nonbinding.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the Town of Rogersville. Its approval or nonapproval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the Town of Rogersville and certified to the secretary of
state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB1420
003671
- 1 -